public/third-party/apertium-translations/apertium-spa.spa.metadix
<pardef n="comp/oner__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ondríamos</l> <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondría</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondríais</l>  <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondrías</l>   <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondrían</l>   <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondría</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondremos</l>  <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondré</l>     <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondréis</l>   <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondrás</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondrán</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondrá</l>     <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>usiéremos</l> <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>usiere</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>usiereis</l>  <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>usieres</l>   <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>usieren</l>   <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>usiere</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oniendo</l>   <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oniéndo</l>   <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usimos</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>use</l>       <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usisteis</l>  <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usiste</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usieron</l>   <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uso</l>       <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ongamos</l>   <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ongámo</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantémo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ongámos</l>   <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantémos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oned</l>      <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>one</l>       <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oned</l>      <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><!-- S__cantad' was replaced --><par n="S__haz"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oné</l>       <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantá"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onéd</l>      <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><!-- S__cantád' was replaced --><par n="S__ház"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ón</l>        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ón</l>        <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cánta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ongan</l>     <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>óngan</l>     <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onga</l>      <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ónga</l>      <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantándo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oner</l>      <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oner</l>      <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onér</l>      <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantár"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oníamos</l>   <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onía</l>      <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oníais</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onías</l>     <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onían</l>     <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onía</l>      <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usiéramos</l> <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>usiésemos</l> <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usiera</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>usiese</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usierais</l>  <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>usieseis</l>  <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usieras</l>   <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>usieses</l>   <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usieran</l>   <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>usiesen</l>   <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usiera</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>usiese</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uestas</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uesta</l>     <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uestos</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uesto</l>     <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onemos</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ongo</l>      <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onéis</l>     <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ones</l>      <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onen</l>      <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>one</l>       <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ongamos</l>   <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onga</l>      <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ongáis</l>    <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ongas</l>     <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ongan</l>     <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onga</l>      <r>oner<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    

<e lm="componer">        <i>comp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="contraponer" a="prompsit2adn"><i>contrap</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deponer" a="prompsit2adn"><i>dep</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="descomponer">     <i>descomp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="disponer">        <i>disp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="exponer">         <i>exp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="imponer">         <i>imp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="indisponer">      <i>indisp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="interponer">      <i>interp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="oponer">          <i>op</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="posponer" a="prompsit2adn"><i>posp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="predisponer" a="prompsit2uoc"><i>predisp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="presuponer">      <i>presup</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="proponer">        <i>prop</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="recomponer" a="prompsit2adn"><i>recomp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reponer">         <i>rep</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sobreponer">      <i>sobrep</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="suponer">         <i>sup</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="superponer" a="prompsit2adn"><i>superp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trasponer" a="prompsit2adn"><i>trasp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="trasponer"><p><l>transp</l><r>trasp</r></p><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="yuxtaponer" a="prompsit"><i>yuxtap</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="autoimponer">     <i>autoimp</i><par n="comp/oner__vblex"/></e>
